Wisconsin, session 2025, AB778.
do enact as follows:AB778,11Section 1. 49.163 (2) (am) 4. of the statutes is repealed.AB778,22Section 2. 49.163 (2) (am) 5. of the statutes is amended to read:AB778,2,5349.163 (2) (am) 5. Be ineligible to receive Have not filed for unemployment 4insurance benefits or have filed but is not eligible for unemployment insurance 5benefits.AB778,2,66